Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB726.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXVI-MCAPITAL INVESTMENT NEEDSSection 2601-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"COVID-19." The novel coronavirus as identified in the proclamation of disaster emergency issued by the Governor on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020), and 1234567891011121314151617181920 any renewal of the state of disaster emergency."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity." A public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2602-M. Reporting requirements.(a) Authorization.--The department shall conduct a one-time survey of each school entity to determine the amount of current capital investment needs of the school entity. The survey shall:(1) Include all needs related to physical, digital, sanitary and curricular infrastructure of the school entity, including resilience and climate requirements for energy backup systems, air and temperature conditioning, insulation, air filtration systems and any other environmental management systems.(2) Include an inventory of all delayed or deferred capital projects of the school entity.(3) Be based on the best available information provided by the school entity.(b) Report.--A r eport by a school entity in response to a survey described in subsection (a) shall be provided to the department and shall include:(1) A full inventory of all infrastructure costs currently delayed, deferred or predicted through the 2027-2028 school year.(2) The age and model of any current physical infrastructure replaced since January 2020 or needing to be replaced, in addition to other physical infrastructure 20250HB0726PN0747 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 details, including the full price of purchase or lease of the infrastructure and the cost of installation of the infrastructure.(3) The full cost or best estimation of the full cost of other educational infrastructure required for the purposes of continuing education since January 2020, including laptops, webcams, additional servers, curriculum adaptation or fees for services for curriculum adaptation as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.(4) The full cost or best estimation of the full cost of sanitation equipment, sanitation measures and sanitation services purchased by the school entity, including personal protective equipment, classroom and office sanitizers or other sanitation needs.(5) Major required equipment costing more than $1,000 since January 2020, which has already been purchased or leased, including the costs paid to purchase or lease the equipment.(6) Equipment or infrastructure that has not yet been purchased but that the school entity believes will be needed to provide a safe, effective and sanitary school environment through the end of the 2027-2028 school year.Section 2603-M. Report to General Assembly.The department shall consolidate the survey results under this article and issue to the General Assembly a detailed report of all current and predicted capital investment and infrastructure needs of school entities throughout this Commonwealth, including all capital costs resulting from the COVID-19 pandemic. The report shall:(1) Specify the full actual cost or best estimation of 20250HB0726PN0747 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the full costs of the capital investment needs required for all the school entities in this Commonwealth.(2) Delineate between actual incurred costs that school entities have already paid, in addition to predicted capital costs for school entities, through the 2027-2028 school year.Section 2604-M. Temporary regulations.(a) Promulgation.--To facilitate the prompt implementation of this article, the department shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire not later than two years after the publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The promulgated temporary regulations shall not be subject to any of the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The authority of the department to promulgate temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire six months after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(c) Publication.--The department shall transmit notice of the temporary regulations under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of 20250HB0726PN0747 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania Bulletin no later than 90 days after the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0726PN0747 - 5 - 123